New Jersey, session 222, A2857.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 1 of P.L.1977, c.223 (C.39:3-54.7) is amended to read as follows: 1.    a.  An active member in good standing of any of the following organizations may mount and operate, on a motor vehicle operated by that member, an emergency warning light or lights as provided in P.L.1977, c.223 (C.39:3-54.7 et seq.): (1)   a volunteer fire company or a volunteer first aid or rescue squad recognized by and rendering service in any municipality; [or] (2)   any county or municipal volunteer Office of Emergency Management recognized by and rendering service in any county or municipality, provided the member's official duties include responding to a fire or emergency call ; (3)   a county fire coordinator or deputy county fire coordinator, as defined in section 3 of P.L.2003, c.28 (C.52:14E-13); or (4)   a county emergency medical services coordinator or deputy county emergency medical services coordinator. b.    The Chief Administrator of the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission shall not require the member to specify on which motor vehicles the emergency warning light or lights may be mounted. (cf: P.L.2005, c.218, s.1) 2.    Section 5 of P.L.1977, c.223, (C.39:3-54.11) is amended to read as follows: 5.    a.  (1) The Chief Administrator of the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission shall prepare suitable identification cards in a form and manner prescribed by and bearing the signature of the chief administrator which, upon the request of the mayor or chief executive officer of any municipality recognizing and being served by a volunteer fire company or a volunteer first aid or rescue squad [on a form and in a manner prescribed by the chief administrator], shall be forwarded to the mayor or chief executive officer, to be countersigned and issued by the mayor or chief executive officer to the members in good standing of the volunteer fire company or first aid or rescue squad. (2)   The chief administrator shall prepare suitable identification cards in a form and manner prescribed by and bearing the signature of the chief administrator which, upon the request of a county executive or director of a board of county commissioners recognizing and being served by a county fire coordinator, deputy county fire coordinator, county emergency medical services coordinator or deputy county emergency medical services coordinator, shall be forwarded to the county executive or director to be countersigned and issued by the county executive or director to the county fire coordinator, deputy county fire coordinator, county emergency medical services coordinator, or deputy county emergency medical services coordinator. b.    Identification cards issued pursuant to subsection a. of this section and sections 5 and 6 of P.L.2005, c.34 (C.39:3-54.22 and C.39:3-54.23) shall be considered permits to mount and operate emergency warning lights as provided for in P.L.1977, c.223 (C.39:3-54.7 et seq.) and shall apply to any motor vehicle driven by the [member of a volunteer fire company, a volunteer first aid or rescue squad or a volunteer Office of Emergency Management] the individual issued the identification card.  Emergency warning lights shall not be mounted prior to the issuance of the identification cards.  Each [member of a volunteer fire company, a volunteer first aid or rescue squad or a volunteer Office of Emergency Management must] individual issued an identification card shall carry the identification card while an emergency warning light or lights are operated on the vehicle. (cf: P.L.2005, c.218, s.4) 3.    Section 6 of P.L.1977, c.223 (C.39:3-54.12) is amended to read as follows: 6.    Nothing contained herein is intended to grant to any [member of a volunteer fire company, a volunteer first aid or rescue squad or a volunteer Office of Emergency Management] individual authorized to operate emergency warning lights any privileges or exemptions denied to the drivers of other vehicles [, and such members] .  An authorized individual operating emergency warning lights shall drive with due regard for the safety of all persons and shall obey all the traffic laws of this State including R.S.39:4-81, provided, however, that the drivers of non-emergency vehicles upon any highway shall yield the right of way to the vehicle of any [member of a volunteer fire company, a volunteer first aid or rescue squad or a volunteer Office of Emergency Management] authorized individual operating emergency warning lights in the same manner as is provided for authorized emergency vehicles pursuant to R.S.39:4-92. (cf: P.L.2005, c.218, s.5) 4.    Section 1 of P.L.1985, c.171 (C.39:3-54.15) is amended to read as follows: 1.    [A current chief or first assistant chief of a volunteer fire company, or chief officer of a first aid or rescue squad, recognized by and rendering service in any municipality may mount and operate on a motor vehicle owned by him and registered in his name a red emergency warning light or lights, a siren, or both, as prescribed in P.L.1985, c.171 (C.39:3-54.15 et seq.).]  a.  The Chief Administrator of the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission shall permit an eligible individual to mount and operate on a motor vehicle owned or leased and registered to the individual a red emergency warning light or lights, a siren, or both, as prescribed in P.L.1985, c.171 (C.39:3-54.15 et seq.), if the individual is: (1) a current chief or first assistant chief of a volunteer fire company, or chief officer of a first aid or rescue squad, recognized by and rendering service in any municipality; (2) a current county fire coordinator or deputy county fire coordinator recognized by and rendering service in any county; or (3) a current county emergency medical services coordinator or deputy county emergency medical services coordinator recognized by and rendering service in any county. b.    The size and type of lights and siren, and the location of their controls, shall be determined by the [Chief Administrator of the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission] chief administrator. (cf: P.L.2005, c.218, s.7) 5.    Section 2 of P.L.1985, c.171 (C.39:3-54.16) is amended to read as follows: All red emergency lights shall be mounted on the exterior of the motor vehicle.  No more than two red emergency warning lights shall be installed on a vehicle.  If one light is used it shall be installed in the center of the roof of the vehicle, or on the left windshield column in a position where a spotlight is normally located.  If two lights are used they may be placed on the windshield columns on each side of the vehicle where spotlights are normally mounted, or on either side of the roof at the front of the vehicle directly back of the top of the windshield. Under no circumstances may one light be placed on the roof and one on a windshield column in the spotlight position.  They shall be operated only while the vehicle is being used by the individual permitted pursuant to section 1 of P.L.1985, c.171 (C.39:3-54.15) [registered owner chief or first assistant chief] in answering a fire or emergency call. (cf: P.L.1985, c.171, s.2) 6.    Section 3 of P.L.1985, c.171 (C.39:3-54.17) is amended to read as follows: All sirens shall be mounted under the hood of the motor vehicle and shall be operated only while the vehicle is being used by the individual permitted pursuant to section 1 of P.L.1985, c.171 (C.39:3-54.15) [registered owner chief or first assistant chief] in answering a fire or emergency call. (cf: P.L.1985, c.171, s.3) 7.    Section 4 of P.L.1985, c.171 (C.39:3-54.18) is amended as follows: a.     The [Director of the Division of Motor Vehicles] Chief Administrator of the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission shall prepare suitable identification cards in a form and manner prescribed by and bearing the signature of the [director] chief administrator, which, upon the request of the mayor or chief executive officer of any municipality recognizing and being served by a volunteer fire company, [on a form and in a manner prescribed by the director,] shall be forwarded to the mayor or chief executive officer, to be countersigned and issued by the mayor or chief executive officer to the chief or first assistant chief of the volunteer fire company.  Identification cards issued pursuant to this [section] subsection shall be considered permits to [display] mount and operate red emergency warning lights, sirens, or both, as provided for in [this act] P.L.1985, c.171 (C.39:3-54.15 et seq.), and no lights or sirens shall be mounted prior to the issuance of the identification cards.  Each chief or first assistant chief of a volunteer fire company shall carry the identification card while red emergency warning lights, sirens, or both, are displayed on [his] the vehicle. b.  The chief administrator shall prepare suitable identification cards in a form and manner prescribed by and bearing the signature of the chief administrator, which, upon the request of a county executive or director of a board of county commissioners recognizing and being served by a county fire coordinator, deputy county fire coordinator, county emergency medical services coordinator, or deputy county emergency services coordinator, shall be forwarded to the county executive or director, to be countersigned and issued by the county executive or director to the county fire coordinator, deputy county fire coordinator, county emergency medical services coordinator, or deputy county emergency medical services coordinator. Identification cards issued pursuant to this subsection shall be considered permits to mount and operate red emergency warning lights, sirens, or both, as provided for in P.L.1985, c.171 (C.39:3-54.15 et seq.). Red emergency warning lights or sirens shall not be mounted prior to the issuance of the identification cards.  Each county fire coordinator, deputy county fire coordinator, county emergency medical services coordinator, or deputy county emergency medical services coordinator shall carry the identification card while red emergency warning lights, sirens, or both, are operated on the vehicle. (cf: P.L.1985, c.171, s.4) 8.    Section 5 of P.L.1985, c.171 (C.39:3-54.19) is amended to read as follows: This act shall not grant to any [chief or first assistant chief of a volunteer fire company] individual issued an identification card pursuant to section 4 of P.L.1985, c.171 any privileges or exemptions denied to the drivers of other vehicles, and persons displaying red emergency warning lights, sirens, or both, shall drive with due regard for the safety of all persons and shall obey the traffic laws of this State; but drivers of nonemergency vehicles upon any highway shall yield the right of way to the vehicle of any chief or first assistant chief of a volunteer fire company, county fire coordinator, deputy county fire coordinator, county emergency medical services coordinator or deputy county emergency medical services coordinator displaying red emergency warning lights, sirens, or both, in the same manner as is provided for authorized emergency vehicles pursuant to R.S.39:4-92. (cf: P.L.1985, c.171, s.5) 9.    This act shall take effect immediately.